Nebraska, session 109, LB1141.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1141 LB1141
2026 2026
Section 1. (1) The Legislature finds that:
(a) Every Nebraska youth should have the opportunity to reach their
full potential, and some youth require additional guidance and support to
reach their goals and make positive changes in their lives through job
training and apprenticeships;
(b) Conserving and developing natural resources and enhancing and
maintaining environmentally important land and water through the
employment of Nebraska's opportunity youth is beneficial not only to the
youth, by providing education and employment opportunities, but also to
the state's economy and environment; and
(c) The Nebraska Youth Pre-Apprentice Conservation Program will
offer Nebraska a unique opportunity to meet the goals of increasing
understanding and appreciation of the environment and supporting
opportunity youth to reach their full potential.
(2) It is the intent of the Legislature:
(a) That Nebraska Youth Pre-Apprentice Conservation Program
participants complete participation to be exposed to building
transferable employment skills;
(b) That the program combines academic, environmental, and job
skills training with personal growth opportunities to develop youth who
can make substantial contributions as Nebraska workers and residents; and
(c) To ensure that the program is self-sustaining with stable and
predictable funding and, in pursuit of such goal, that all state agencies
look to the program first to have its participants engage in projects
that further the mission of the program.
Sec. 2. For purposes of sections 1 to 6 of this act:
(1) Commission means the Game and Parks Commission; and
(2) Opportunity youth means a child who (a) has been impacted
directly by trauma, including adverse childhood experiences, (b) has had
negative contact with law enforcement, or (c) is not experiencing success
in school or is in jeopardy of not completing school.
-2-

LB1141 LB1141
2026 2026
Sec. 3. (1) The Nebraska Youth Pre-Apprentice Conservation Program
is created. The purpose of the program is to employ Nebraska's
opportunity youth on projects which contribute to conserving or
developing natural resources and enhancing and maintaining
environmentally important land and water under the jurisdiction of the
commission and the Department of Labor. The program shall combine
academic, environmental, and job skills training with personal growth
opportunities for the participants. Beginning January 1, 2027, the
commission shall administer and maintain the Nebraska Youth Pre-
Apprentice Conservation Program in collaboration with other appropriate
state agencies.
(2) Participants in the Nebraska Youth Pre-Apprentice Conservation
Program shall be opportunity youth who are (a) sixteen years of age or
older and younger than twenty-one years of age, (b) unemployed, (c)
residents of Nebraska, and (d) on probation or supervision or assigned to
a diversion program. The commission shall develop a process for
opportunity youth to apply to or be selected for the program. Special
effort shall be made to select as participants opportunity youth residing
in a qualified census tract as defined in section 81-12,240.
(3) Participants in the Nebraska Youth Pre-Apprentice Conservation
Program shall be paid not less than the minimum wage. Participation in
the program shall be for a period of six weeks for each participant.
(4) Participants in the Nebraska Youth Pre-Apprentice Conservation
Program shall not be considered state employees for any purpose,
including, but not limited to, the State Employees Collective Bargaining
Act, the State Employees Retirement Act, the Employment Security Law, the
state employees group health insurance program and any other group
insurance available to state employees, vacation leave, sick leave, or
any other paid leave program available to state employees, any other
benefits offered to state employees based on their status as state
employees, hours of work, rates of compensation, or leave under the
-3-

LB1141 LB1141
2026 2026
federal Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993. This subsection does not
apply to crew chiefs and other administrative and supervisory personnel
of the program, all of whom shall be employees of the commission.
Sec. 4. The Game and Parks Commission may adopt and promulgate
rules and regulations to carry out sections 1 to 6 of this act and may
consult other interested agencies to carry out the Nebraska Youth Pre-
Apprentice Conservation Program including, but not limited to, the
Department of Labor.
Sec. 5. On or before December 31, 2027, the commission shall
electronically report to the Natural Resources Committee of the
Legislature, Appropriations Committee of the Legislature, and Business
and Labor Committee of the Legislature on the Nebraska Youth Pre-
Apprentice Conservation Program. The report shall include, at a minimum,
the number and ages of the participants, the areas in which they reside,
the rate of compensation of participants, the number and type of projects
in which participants engaged, the significance of those projects to the
environment and the economy of the state, and any other matters the
commission deems significant for inclusion in the report. The report
shall not include any personally identifiable information on any
participant.
Sec. 6. (1) The Nebraska Youth Pre-Apprentice Conservation Program
Fund is created. The fund shall consist of transfers by the Legislature
and any gifts, grants, bequests, and other contributions to the fund. The
fund shall be used by the commission to carry out the Nebraska Youth Pre-
Apprentice Conservation Program. Any money in the fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to
the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.
(2) The State Treasurer shall transfer seven hundred fifty thousand
dollars from the Workforce Development Program Cash Fund to the Nebraska
Youth Pre-Apprentice Conservation Program Fund as soon as
-4-

LB1141 LB1141
2026 2026
administratively possible after the effective date of this act, on such
dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the
budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.
Sec. 7. Section 81-407, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
81-407 (1) The Workforce Development Program Cash Fund is hereby
created. The fund shall consist of transfers authorized by the
Legislature.
(2) The Department of Labor shall administer the fund. The fund may
be used:
(a) To provide workforce development grants;
(b) To pay the costs of administering the workforce development
grant program;
(c) To pay the costs of establishing, assessing, collecting, and
maintaining state unemployment insurance tax liability and payments;
(d) To pay unemployment benefits if determined necessary by the
Commissioner of Labor;
(e) To provide labor availability, skills gap, and workforce
development studies and reports by the Department of Labor; and
(f) For purposes of the Manufacturing Modernization and Workforce
Development Pilot Investment Act.
(3) Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund, or the
Nebraska Opportunity Grant Fund, or the Nebraska Youth Pre-Apprentice
Conservation Program Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money
in the Workforce Development Program Cash Fund available for investment
shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment
Act.
(4)(a) As part of the workforce development grant program described
in subdivision (2)(a) of this section, the Nebraska Workforce Development
Board shall submit grant proposals to the Commissioner of Labor for the
-5-

LB1141 LB1141
2026 2026
commissioner's consideration. The board's proposals shall be submitted by
April 30 of each year and shall set forth strategies and initiatives
designed to develop the workforce in the state. Each such proposal shall:
(i) Include a description of the purpose of the proposed grant and
the desired outcome; and
(ii) Include a method of measuring success for the proposed grant.
(b) The board may submit up to eighteen grant proposals per calendar
year.
(c) The commissioner may approve, reject, or modify any grant
proposal submitted by the board. In the case of a rejection or
modification of any grant proposal, the commissioner shall provide
written notice of the decision to the board and include the rationale for
the rejection or modification.
(d) The commissioner shall have the discretion to approve up to
three grant proposals per calendar year without the prior approval of the
board. If the total of the three proposals exceeds twenty-five percent of
the unobligated beginning annual balance of the Workforce Development
Program Cash Fund, the commissioner shall submit a report detailing the
proposals to the board and to the chairperson of the Appropriations
Committee of the Legislature within ninety days after approving such
proposals.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, Nebraska Workforce Development
Board means the state workforce development board authorized by the
federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act and established in
Nebraska.
Sec. 8. Original section 81-407, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025,
is repealed.
-6-